California statutes. Probate Code
No action for the recovery of any property sold by a guardian or conservator may be maintained by the ward or conservatee or by any person claiming under the ward or conservatee unless commenced within the later of the following times:

(a) Three years after the termination of the guardianship or conservatorship. 

(b) When a legal disability to sue exists by reason of minority or otherwise at the time the cause of action accrues, within three years after the removal thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Notes, Mortgages, Leases, Conveyances, and Exchanges [2550. - 2557.]

2550.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, a guardian or conservator may borrow money, lend money, give security, lease, convey, or exchange property of the estate, or engage in any other transaction under this article only after authorization by order of the court. Such an order may be obtained in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 572, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2551.

(a) In any case described in Section 2541 or Section 2552, the guardian or conservator, after authorization by order of the court, may borrow money upon a note, either unsecured or to be secured by a security interest or other lien on the personal property of the estate or any part thereof or to be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on the real property of the estate or any part thereof. The guardian or conservator shall apply the money to the purpose specified in the order.

(b) To obtain an order under this section, the guardian or conservator, the ward or conservatee, or any other interested person may file a petition with the court. The petition shall state the purpose for which the order is sought, the necessity for or advantage to accrue from the order, the amount of money proposed to be borrowed, the rate of interest to be paid, the length of time the note is to run, and a general description of the property proposed to be mortgaged or subjected to a deed of trust or other lien. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(c) The court may require such additional proof of the fairness and feasibility of the transaction as the court determines is necessary. If the required showing is made, the court may make an order authorizing the transaction.

The court in its order may do any one or more of the following:

(1) Order that the amount specified in the petition, or a lesser amount, be borrowed.

(2) Prescribe the maximum rate of interest and the period of the loan.

(3) Require that the interest and the whole or any part of the principal be paid from time to time out of the estate or any part thereof.

(4) Require that the personal property used as security or any buildings on real property to be mortgaged or subjected to the deed of trust be insured for the further security of the lender and that the premiums be paid out of the estate. 

(5) Specify the purpose for which the money to be borrowed is to be applied. 

(6) Prescribe such other terms and conditions concerning the transaction as the court determines to be to the advantage of the estate.

(d) The note and the mortgage or deed of trust, if any, shall be signed by the guardian or conservator.

(e) Jurisdiction of the court to administer the estate of the ward or conservatee is effectual to vest the court with jurisdiction to make the order for the note and for the security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust. This jurisdiction shall conclusively inure to the benefit of the owner of the security interest or lien, mortgagee named in the mortgage, or the trustee and beneficiary named in the deed of trust, and their heirs and assigns. No omission, error, or irregularity in the proceedings shall impair or invalidate the proceedings or the note, security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust given pursuant to an order under this section.

(f) Upon any foreclosure or sale under a security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust described in subdivision (a), if the proceeds of the sale of the encumbered property are insufficient to pay the note, the security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust, and the costs or expenses of sale, no judgment or claim for any deficiency may be had or allowed against the ward or conservatee or the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2552.

(a) The guardian or conservator may give a security interest or other lien upon the personal property of the estate or any part thereof or a mortgage or deed of trust upon the real property of the estate or any part thereof, after authorization by order of the court as provided in Section 2551, for any of the following purposes:

(1) To pay, reduce, extend, or renew a security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust already existing on property of the estate.

(2) To improve, use, operate, or preserve the property proposed to be mortgaged or subjected to a deed of trust, or some part thereof.

(b) If property of the estate consists of an undivided interest in real or personal property, or any other interest therein less than the entire ownership, upon a showing that it would be to the advantage of the estate to borrow money to improve, use, operate, or preserve the property jointly with the owners of the other interests therein, or to pay, reduce, extend, or renew a security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust already existing on all of the property, the guardian or conservator, after authorization by order of the court as provided in Section 2551, may join with the owners of the other interests in the borrowing of money and the execution of a joint and several note and such security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust as may be required to secure the payment of the note. The note may be for such sum as is required for the purpose.

(c) No omission, error, or irregularity in the proceedings under this section shall impair or invalidate the proceedings or the note, security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust given pursuant to an order made under this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2552.5.

For the purpose of this article, if a lease gives the lessee the right to extend the term of the lease, the length of the term shall be considered as though the right to extend had been exercised.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2553.

(a) Except as provided in Section 2555, leases may be executed by the guardian or conservator with respect to the property of the estate only after authorization by order of the court.

(b) To obtain an order under this section, the guardian or conservator or any interested person may file a petition with the court. The petition shall state (1) a general description of the property proposed to be leased, (2) the term, rental, and general conditions of the proposed lease, and (3) the advantage to the estate to accrue from giving the lease. If the lease is proposed to be for a term longer than 10 years, the petition shall also state facts showing the need for the longer lease and its advantage to the estate. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(c) At the hearing, the court shall entertain and consider any other offer made in good faith at the hearing to lease the same property on more favorable terms. If the court is satisfied that it will be to the advantage of the estate, the court shall make an order authorizing the guardian or conservator to make the lease to the person and on the terms and conditions stated in the order. The court shall not make an order authorizing the guardian or conservator to make the lease to any person other than the lessee named in the petition unless the offer made at the hearing is acceptable to the guardian or conservator.

(d) Jurisdiction of the court to administer the estate of the ward or conservatee is effectual to vest the court with jurisdiction to make the order for the lease. This jurisdiction shall conclusively inure to the benefit of the lessee and the lessee’s heirs and assigns. No omission, error, or irregularity in the proceedings shall impair or invalidate the proceedings or the lease made pursuant to an order made under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2554.

(a) An order authorizing the execution of a lease shall set forth the minimum rental or royalty or both and the period of the lease, which shall be for such time as the court may authorize.

(b) The order may authorize other terms and conditions, including, with respect to a lease for the purpose of exploration for or production or removal of minerals, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances, or geothermal energy, any one or more of the following:

(1) A provision for the payment of rental and royalty to a depositary.

(2) A provision for the appointment of a common agent to represent the interests of all the lessors.

(3) A provision for the payment of a compensatory royalty in lieu of rental and in lieu of drilling and producing operations on the land covered by the lease. 

(4) A provision empowering the lessee to enter into any agreement authorized by Section 3301 of the Public Resources Code with respect to the land covered by the lease.

(5) A provision for a community oil lease or pooling or unitization by the lessee.

(c) If the lease covers additional property owned by other persons or an undivided or other interest of the ward or conservatee less than the entire ownership in the property, the order may authorize the lease to provide for division of rental and royalty in the proportion that the land or interest of each owner bears to the total area of the land or total interests covered by such lease.

(d) If the lease is for the purpose of exploration for or production or removal of minerals, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances, or geothermal energy, the court may authorize that the lease be for a fixed period and any of the following:

(1) So long thereafter as minerals, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances or geothermal energy are produced in paying quantities from the property leased or mining or drilling operations are conducted thereon.

(2) If the lease provides for the payment of a compensatory royalty, so long thereafter as such compensatory royalty is paid.

(3) If the land covered by the lease is included in an agreement authorized by Section 3301 of the Public Resources Code, so long thereafter as oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances are produced in paying quantities from any of the lands included in any such agreement or drilling operations are conducted thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2555.

If it is to the advantage of the estate, the guardian or conservator may lease, as lessor, real property of the estate without authorization of the court in either of the following cases:

(a) Where the rental does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) a month and the term does not exceed two years.

(b) Where the lease is from month to month, regardless of the amount of the rental.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 48 of Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

2556.

(a) If it is for the advantage, benefit, and best interests of the estate and those interested therein, the guardian or conservator, after authorization by order of the court, may do any of the following either with or without consideration:

(1) Dedicate or convey real property of the estate for any purpose to any of the following:

(A) This state or any public entity in this state.

(B) The United States or any agency or instrumentality of the United States. 

(2) Dedicate or convey an easement over any real property of the estate to any person for any purpose.

(3) Convey, release, or relinquish to this state or any public entity in this state any access rights to any street, highway, or freeway from any real property of the estate.

(4) Consent as a lienholder to a dedication, conveyance, release, or relinquishment under paragraph (1), (2), or (3) by the owner of property subject to the lien.

(b) To obtain an order under this section, the guardian or conservator or any other interested person shall file a petition with the court. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2557.

(a) Whenever it is for the advantage, benefit, and best interests of the ward or conservatee and those legally entitled to support, maintenance, or education from the ward or conservatee, the guardian or conservator, after authorization by order of the court, may exchange any property of the estate for other property upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the court. The terms and conditions prescribed by the court may include the payment or receipt of part cash by the guardian or conservator.

(b) To obtain an order under this section, the guardian or conservator or any interested person shall file a petition containing all of the following:

(1) A description of the property.

(2) The terms and conditions of the proposed exchange.

(3) A showing that the proposed exchange is for the advantage, benefit, and best interests of the ward or conservatee and those legally entitled to support, maintenance, or education from the ward or conservatee.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(d) If the petition is for authorization to exchange stocks, bonds, or other securities as defined in Section 10200 for different stocks, bonds, or other securities, the court, upon a showing of good cause, may order that the notice be given for a shorter period or be dispensed with.

(e) After authorization by order of the court, the guardian or conservator may execute the conveyance or transfer to the person with whom the exchange is made to effectuate the exchange.

(f) No omission, error, or irregularity in the proceedings under this section shall impair or invalidate the proceedings or the exchange made pursuant to an order made under this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Investments and Purchase of Property [2570. - 2574.]

2570.

(a) The guardian or conservator, after authorization by order of the court, may invest the proceeds of sales and any other money of the estate as provided in the order.

(b) To obtain an order of the court authorizing a transaction under subdivision (a) of this section, the guardian or conservator, the ward or conservatee, or any other interested person may file a petition with the court.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1. The court may order that the notice be dispensed with.

(d) The court may require such proof of the fairness and feasibility of the transaction as the court determines is necessary.

(e) If the required showing is made, the court may make an order authorizing the transaction and may prescribe in the order the terms and conditions upon which the transaction shall be made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2571.

When authorized by order of the court under Section 2570, the guardian or conservator may purchase:

(a) Real property in this state as a home for the ward or conservatee if such purchase is for the advantage, benefit, and best interest of the ward or conservatee.

(b) Real property as a home for those legally entitled to support and maintenance from the ward or conservatee if such purchase is for the advantage, benefit, and best interest of the ward or conservatee and of those legally entitled to support and maintenance from the ward or conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2572.

An order authorizing the guardian or conservator to purchase real property may authorize the guardian or conservator to join with the spouse of the ward or the spouse or domestic partner of the conservatee or with any other person or persons in the purchase of the real property, or an interest, equity, or estate therein, in severalty, in common, in community, or in joint tenancy, for cash or upon a credit or for part cash and part credit. When the court authorizes the purchase of real property, the court may order the guardian or conservator to execute all necessary instruments and commitments to complete the transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2573.

An order authorizing investment in bonds issued by any state or of any city, county, city and county, political subdivision, public corporation, district, or special district of any state may authorize the guardian or conservator to select from among bonds issued by any such issuer, without specifying any particular issuer or issue of bonds, if the type of issuer is designated in general terms and the order specifies as to such bonds a minimum quality rating as shown in a recognized investment service, a minimum interest coupon rate, a minimum yield to maturity, and the date of maturity within a five-year range.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2574.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the guardian or conservator, without authorization of the court, may invest funds of the estate pursuant to this section in:

(1) Direct obligations of the United States, or of the State of California, maturing not later than five years from the date of making the investment.

(2) United States Treasury bonds redeemable at par value on the death of the holder for payment of federal estate taxes, regardless of maturity date.

(3) Securities listed on an established stock or bond exchange in the United States which are purchased
 on such exchange.

(4) Eligible securities for the investment of surplus state moneys as provided for in Section 16430 of the Government Code.

(5) An interest in a money market mutual fund registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1, et seq.) or an investment vehicle authorized for the collective investment of trust funds pursuant to Section 9.18 of Part 9 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the portfolios of which are limited to United States government obligations maturing not later than five years from the date of investment and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by United States government obligations.

(6) Units of a common trust fund described in Section 1585 of the Financial Code. The common trust fund shall have as its objective investment primarily in
 short-term fixed income obligations and shall be permitted to value investments at cost pursuant to regulations of the appropriate regulatory authority.

(b) In making and retaining investments made under this section, the guardian or conservator shall take into consideration the circumstances of the estate, indicated cash needs, and, if reasonably ascertainable, the date of the prospective termination of the guardianship or conservatorship.

(c) This section shall not limit the authority of the guardian or conservator to seek court authorization for any investment, or to make other investments with court authorization, as provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 136.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Substituted Judgment [2580. - 2586.]

2580.

(a) The conservator or other interested person may file a petition under this article for an order of the court authorizing or requiring the conservator to take a proposed action for any one or more of the following purposes:

(1) Benefiting the conservatee or the estate.

(2) Minimizing current or prospective taxes or expenses of administration of the conservatorship estate or of the estate upon the death of the conservatee.

(3) Providing gifts for any purposes, and to any charities, relatives (including the other spouse or
 domestic partner), friends, or other objects of bounty, as would be likely beneficiaries of gifts from the conservatee.

(b) The action proposed in the petition may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Making gifts of principal or income, or both, of the estate, outright or in trust.

(2) Conveying or releasing the conservatee’s contingent and expectant interests in property, including marital property rights and any right of survivorship incident to joint tenancy or tenancy by the entirety.

(3) Exercising or releasing the conservatee’s powers as donee of a power of appointment.

(4) Entering into contracts.

(5) Creating for the benefit of the conservatee or others, revocable or irrevocable trusts of the property of the estate, which trusts may extend beyond the conservatee’s disability or life. A special needs trust for money paid pursuant to a compromise or judgment for a conservatee may be established only under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3600) of Part 8, and not under this article.

(6) Transferring to a trust created by the conservator or conservatee any property unintentionally omitted from the trust.

(7) Exercising options of the conservatee to purchase or exchange securities or other property.

(8) Exercising the rights of the conservatee to elect benefit or payment options, to terminate, to change beneficiaries or ownership, to assign rights, to borrow, or to receive cash value in return for a surrender of rights under any of the following:

(A) Life insurance policies, plans, or benefits.

(B) Annuity policies, plans, or benefits.

(C) Mutual fund and other dividend investment plans.

(D) Retirement, profit sharing, and employee welfare plans and benefits.

(9) Exercising the right of the conservatee to elect to take under or against a will.

(10) Exercising the right of the conservatee to disclaim any interest that may be disclaimed under Part 8 (commencing with Section 260) of Division 2.

(11) Exercising the right of the conservatee (A) to revoke or modify a revocable trust or (B) to surrender the right to revoke or modify a revocable trust, but the court shall not authorize or require the conservator to exercise the right to revoke or modify a revocable trust if the instrument governing the trust (A) evidences an intent to reserve the right of revocation or modification exclusively to the conservatee, (B) provides expressly that a conservator may not revoke or modify the trust, or (C) otherwise evidences an intent that would be inconsistent with authorizing or requiring the conservator to exercise the right to revoke or modify the trust.

(12) Making an election referred to in Section 13502 or an election and agreement referred to in Section 13503.

(13) Making a will.

(14) Making or revoking a revocable transfer on death deed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 293, Sec. 7.   (AB 139)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2581.

Notice of the hearing of the petition shall be given, regardless of age, for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) or Part 1 to all of the following:

(a) The persons required to be given notice under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(b) The persons required to be named in a petition for the appointment of a conservator.

(c) So far as is known to the petitioner, beneficiaries under any document executed by the conservatee which may have testamentary effect unless the court for good cause dispenses with such notice.

(d) So far as is known to the petitioner, the persons who, if the conservatee were to die immediately, would be the conservatee’s heirs under the laws of intestate succession unless the court for good cause dispenses with such notice.

(e) Such other persons as the court may order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2582.

The court may make an order authorizing or requiring the proposed action under this article only if the court determines all of the following:

(a) The conservatee either (1) is not opposed to the proposed action or (2) if opposed to the proposed action, lacks legal capacity for the proposed action. 

(b) Either the proposed action will have no adverse effect on the estate or the estate remaining after the proposed action is taken will be adequate to provide for the needs of the conservatee and for the support of those legally entitled to support, maintenance, and education from the conservatee, taking into account the age, physical condition, standards of living, and all other relevant circumstances of the conservatee and those legally entitled to support, maintenance, and education from the conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2583.

In determining whether to authorize or require a proposed action under this article, the court shall take into consideration all the relevant circumstances, which may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Whether the conservatee has legal capacity for the proposed transaction and, if not, the probability of the conservatee’s recovery of legal capacity.

(b) The past donative declarations, practices, and conduct of the conservatee.

(c) The traits of the conservatee.

(d) The relationship and intimacy of the prospective donees with the
 conservatee, their standards of living, and the extent to which they would be natural objects of the conservatee’s bounty by any objective test based on such relationship, intimacy, and standards of living.

(e) The wishes of the conservatee.

(f) Any known estate plan of the conservatee (including, but not limited to, the conservatee’s will, any trust of which the conservatee is the settlor or beneficiary, any power of appointment created by or exercisable by the conservatee, and any contract, transfer, or joint ownership arrangement with provisions for payment or transfer of benefits or interests at the conservatee’s death to another or others which the conservatee may have originated).

(g) The manner in which the estate would devolve upon the conservatee’s death, giving consideration to the age and the mental and
 physical condition of the conservatee, the prospective devisees or heirs of the conservatee, and the prospective donees.

(h) The value, liquidity, and productiveness of the estate.

(i) The minimization of current or prospective income, estate, inheritance, or other taxes or expenses of administration.

(j) Changes of tax laws and other laws which would likely have motivated the conservatee to alter the conservatee’s estate plan.

(k) The likelihood from all the circumstances that the conservatee as a reasonably prudent person would take the proposed action if the conservatee had the capacity to do so.

(l) Whether any beneficiary is the spouse or domestic partner of the conservatee.

(m) Whether a beneficiary has committed physical abuse, neglect, false imprisonment, or financial abuse against the conservatee after the conservatee was substantially unable to manage his or her financial resources, or resist fraud or undue influence, and the conservatee’s disability persisted throughout the time of the hearing on the proposed substituted judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 308, Sec. 10.   (SB 647)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2584.

After hearing, the court, in its discretion, may approve, modify and approve, or disapprove the proposed action and may authorize or direct the conservator to transfer or dispose of assets or take other action as provided in the court’s order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2585.

Nothing in this article imposes any duty on the conservator to propose any action under this article, and the conservator is not liable for failure to propose any action under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2586.

(a) As used in this section, “estate plan of the conservatee” includes, but is not limited to, the conservatee’s will, any trust of which the conservatee is the settlor or beneficiary, any power of appointment created by or exercisable by the conservatee, and any contract, transfer, or joint ownership arrangement with provisions for payment or transfer of benefits or interests at the conservatee’s death to another or others which the conservatee may have originated.

(b) Notwithstanding Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code (lawyer-client privilege), the court, in its discretion, may order that any person having possession of any document constituting all or part of the estate plan of the conservatee shall deliver the document to the court for examination by the court, and, in the discretion of the court, by the attorneys for the persons who have appeared in the proceedings under this article, in connection with the petition filed under this article.

(c) Unless the court otherwise orders, no person who examines any document produced pursuant to an order under this section shall disclose the contents of the document to any other person. If that disclosure is made, the court may adjudge the person making the disclosure to be in contempt of court.

(d) For good cause, the court may order that a document constituting all or part of the estate plan of the conservatee, whether or not produced pursuant to an order under this section, shall be delivered for safekeeping to the custodian designated by the court. The court may impose those conditions it determines are appropriate for holding and safeguarding the document. The court may authorize the conservator to take any action a depositor may take under Part 15 (commencing with Section 700) of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Independent Exercise of Powers [2590. - 2595.]

2590.

(a) The court may, in its discretion, make an order granting the guardian or conservator any one or more or all of the powers specified in Section 2591 if the court determines that, under the circumstances of the particular guardianship or conservatorship, it would be to the advantage, benefit, and best interest of the estate to do so. Subject only to the requirements, conditions, or limitations as are specifically and expressly provided, either directly or by reference, in the order granting the power or powers, and if consistent with Section 2591, the guardian or conservator may exercise the granted power or powers without notice, hearing, or court authorization, instructions, approval, or confirmation in the same manner as the ward or conservatee could do if possessed of legal capacity.

(b) The guardian or conservator does not have a power specified in Section 2591 without authorization by a court under this article or other express provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 553, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2591.

The powers referred to in Section 2590 are:

(a) The power to operate, for a period longer than 45 days, at the risk of the estate a business, farm, or enterprise constituting an asset of the estate.

(b) The power to grant and take options.

(c) (1) The power to sell at public or private sale real or personal property of the estate without confirmation of the court of the sale, other than the personal residence of a conservatee.

(2) The power to sell at public or private sale the personal residence of the
 conservatee as described in Section 2591.5 without confirmation of the court of the sale. The power granted pursuant to this paragraph is subject to the requirements of Sections 2352.5, 2540, 2541, and 2541.5.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, authority to sell property includes authority to contract for the sale and fulfill the terms and conditions of the contract, including conveyance of the property.

(d) The power to create by grant or otherwise easements and servitudes.

(e) The power to borrow money.

(f) The power to give security for the repayment of a loan.

(g) The power to purchase real or
 personal property.

(h) The power to alter, improve, raze, replace, and rebuild property of the estate.

(i) The power to let or lease property of the estate, or extend, renew, or modify a lease of real property, for which the monthly rental or lease term exceeds the maximum specified in Sections 2501 and 2555 for any purpose (including exploration for and removal of gas, oil, and other minerals and natural resources) and for any period, including a term commencing at a future time.

(j) The power to lend money on adequate security.

(k) The power to exchange property of the estate.

(l) The power to sell
 property of the estate on credit if any unpaid portion of the selling price is adequately secured.

(m) The power to commence and maintain an action for partition. The power granted pursuant to this subdivision is subject to the requirements of Sections 2352.5, 2540, 2541, and 2541.5.

(n) The power to exercise stock rights and stock options.

(o) The power to participate in and become subject to and to consent to the provisions of a voting trust and of a reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, liquidation, or other modification or adjustment affecting estate property.

(p) The power to pay, collect, compromise, or otherwise adjust claims, debts, or demands
 upon the guardianship or conservatorship described in subdivision (a) of Section 2501, Section 2502 or 2504, or to arbitrate any dispute described in Section 2406.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 91, Sec. 5.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2591.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, a conservator seeking an order under Section 2590 authorizing a sale of the conservatee’s personal residence shall demonstrate to the court that the terms of sale, including the price for which the property is to be sold, the commissions to be paid from the estate, estimated capital gains income and tax consequences, and impact on access to governmental benefits, are in all respects in the best interests of the conservatee.

(b) A conservator authorized to sell the conservatee’s personal residence pursuant to Section 2590 shall comply with the provisions of Section 10309 concerning appraisal or new appraisal of the property for sale and sale at a minimum offer price.
 Notwithstanding Section 10309, if the last appraisal of the conservatee’s personal residence was conducted more than six months prior to the proposed sale of the property, a new appraisal shall be required prior to the sale of the property, unless the court finds that it is in the best interests of the conservatee to rely on an appraisal of the personal residence that was conducted not more than one year prior to the proposed sale of the property. For purposes of this section, the date of sale is the date of the contract for sale of the property.

(c) Within 15 days of the close of escrow, the conservator shall serve a copy of the final escrow settlement statement on all persons entitled to notice of the petition for appointment for a conservator and all persons who have filed and served a request for special notice and shall file a copy of the final escrow statement along with a proof of service with the
 court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 847, Sec. 5.   (SB 303)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2592.

(a) The guardian or conservator may apply by petition for an order under Section 2590.

(b) The application for the order may be included in the petition for the appointment of the guardian or conservator. In such case, the notice of hearing on the petition shall include a statement that the petition includes an application for the grant of one or more powers under this article and shall list the specific power or powers applied for.

(c) If the application for the order is made by petition filed after the filing of the petition for the appointment of the guardian or conservator, notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2593.

(a) The court, on its own motion or on petition of any interested person, when it appears to be for the best interests of the ward or conservatee or the estate, may withdraw any or all of the powers previously granted pursuant to this article or may impose restrictions, conditions, and limitations on the exercise of such powers by the guardian or conservator.

(b) Notice of the hearing on a petition under this section shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2594.

(a) When a power or powers are granted pursuant to this article, the letters of guardianship or conservatorship shall state the power or powers so granted and the restrictions, conditions, or limitations, if any, prescribed in the order and shall refer to this article.

(b) When a power or powers are granted by a subsequent order, new letters shall be issued in the form described in subdivision (a).

(c) If the powers are withdrawn, or if the powers are restricted, conditioned, or limited by a subsequent order after they are granted, new letters shall be issued accordingly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2595.

(a) The grant of a power or powers pursuant to this article does not affect the right of the guardian or conservator to petition the court as provided in Section 2403 or to petition the court under other provisions of this code, as to a particular transaction or matter, in the same manner as if the power or powers had not been granted pursuant to this article.

(b) Where authority exists under other provisions of law, either general or specific, for the guardian or conservator to do any act or to enter into any transaction described in Section 2591, the guardian or conservator may proceed under such other provisions of law and is not required to obtain authority under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Inventory and Accounts [2600. - 2633.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [2600. - 2601.]

2600.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
